Tennessee, session 114, HB0451.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-32-101, is amended by deleting
subdivision (g)(2)(B) and substituting:
(B) At the time of the filing of the petition for expunction, at least one (1) year has
elapsed since the completion of the sentence imposed for the offense the person is
seeking to have expunged; and
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-32-101, is amended by deleting
subdivision (k)(1)(C) and substituting:
(C) At the time of the filing of the petition for expunction, at least one (1) year
has elapsed since the completion of the sentence imposed for the offense the person is
seeking to have expunged;
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-32-101, is amended by deleting
subdivision (m)(1)(A) and substituting:
(A) At the time of the filing of the petition for expunction, at least one (1) year has
elapsed since the completion of the sentence imposed for the offense the person is
seeking to have expunged;
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0451
001052
- 1 -